fr: Type de fixation de la mèche: Extrémités à boucle; Extrémités à vis Chicago; Extrémités à concho; Extrémités à changement rapide; Extrémités à pression; Extrémités à lacer; Autre
sv: Typ av bitfäste: Spännänden; Chicagoskruvar; Conchoänden; Snabblås; Karbinhakar; Knytänden; Övrigt
pl: Typ mocowania wiertła: Zapinane na sprzączki; Śruby kaletnicze (Chicago); Mocowanie na concho; Szybkozłączki; Zapięcia karabińczykowe; Wiązane (na rzemyki); Inne
pt-BR: Tipo de fixação da broca: Extremidades com fivela; Extremidades com parafuso Chicago; Extremidades com concho; Extremidades de troca rápida; Extremidades com fecho de mola; Extremidades de amarrar; Outro
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης ρύγχους: Απολήξεις με αγκράφα; Απολήξεις με βίδες τύπου Chicago; Απολήξεις με concho; Απολήξεις γρήγορης αλλαγής; Απολήξεις με κλιπ; Απολήξεις με δέσιμο; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve nastavka: Konci z zaponko; Konci z vijaki Chicago; Konci s konči; Konci za hitro menjavo; Konci s karabinom; Konci za zavezovanje; Drugo
fi: Kuolaimen kiinnitystyyppi: Solkipäät; Chicago-ruuvipäät; Concho-päät; Pikavaihtopäät; Pikalukkopäät; Solmittavat päät; Muu
sk-SK: Typ uchytenia bitu: Konce s prackou; Konce s chicagskymi skrutkami; Konce s concho; Rýchloupínacie konce; Konce s karabínkou; Konce na uviazanie; Iné
zh-TW: 鑽頭固定類型: 扣環尾端; 芝加哥螺絲尾端; 康秋裝飾尾端; 快拆尾端; 彈簧扣尾端; 綁帶尾端; 其他
ja: ビットアタッチメントタイプ: バックルエンド; シカゴスクリューエンド; コンチョエンド; クイックチェンジエンド; スナップエンド; タイエンド; その他
cs: Typ připojení bitů: S přezkou; Na šroubky (Chicago); S conchos; Rychlovýměnné koncovky; Na karabiny; Na zavazování; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de fixação do freio: Extremidades com fivela; Extremidades com parafusos Chicago; Extremidades com apliques; Extremidades de mudança rápida; Extremidades com fecho de mola; Extremidades com amarração; Outros
da: Fastgørelsestype for bit: Spændeender; Chicago-skrueender; Concho-ender; Quick-change-ender; Karabinhage-ender; Bindeender; Andet
de: Befestigungsart des Gebisses: Schnallenenden; Buchschraubenenden; Concho-Enden; Schnellwechsel-Enden; Karabinerenden; Binde-Enden; Sonstige
en: Bit attachment type: Buckle ends; Chicago screw ends; Concho ends; Quick-change ends; Snap ends; Tie ends; Other
it: Tipo di fissaggio del bit: Con fibbia; Con viti Chicago; Con conchos; A cambio rapido; Con moschettone; A laccio; Altro
ko: 비트 부착 유형: 버클 엔드; 시카고 스크루 엔드; 콘초 엔드; 퀵 체인지 엔드; 스냅 엔드; 타이 엔드; 기타
th: ประเภทการยึดบังเหียน: ปลายหัวเข็มขัด; ปลายสกรูชิคาโก; ปลายคอนโช; ปลายแบบเปลี่ยนเร็ว; ปลายสแน็ป; ปลายเชือกผูก; อื่นๆ
vi: Kiểu chuôi gắn mũi khoan: Đầu khóa; Đầu vít Chicago; Đầu concho; Đầu thay nhanh; Đầu bấm; Đầu buộc; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta pričvršćivanja svrdla: Završeci s kopčom; Završeci s Chicago vijkom; Završeci s ukrasnim gumbom (concho); Završeci za brzu izmjenu; Završeci s karabinerom; Završeci na vezivanje; Ostalo
tr: Gem bağlantı tipi: Tokalı uçlar; Chicago vidalı uçlar; Konçolu uçlar; Hızlı değiştirilebilir uçlar; Klipsli uçlar; Bağlamalı uçlar; Diğer
nl: Type bitbevestiging: Gespsluiting; Chicago-schroeven; Concho-sluiting; Snelwisselsluiting; Drukknoopsluiting; Striksluiting; Anders
ru: Тип крепления биты: На пряжках; На винтах (Chicago screws); С кончо; Быстросъемные; На карабинах; На завязках; Другое
nb: Festetype for bits: Spenne-ender; Chicago-skrue-ender; Concho-ender; Hurtigbytte-ender; Klips-ender; Knyte-ender; Annet
hu: Bit rögzítési típusa: Csatos végek; Chicago csavaros végek; Concho végek; Gyorskioldós végek; Karabineres végek; Kötős végek; Egyéb
zh-CN: 口衔连接类型: 带扣末端; 子母钉末端; 银饰末端; 快拆末端; 按扣末端; 系带末端; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de prindere a burghiului: Capete cu cataramă; Capete cu șurub Chicago; Capete Concho; Capete cu schimbare rapidă; Capete cu capsă; Capete de legat; Altele
lt-LT: Žąslų tvirtinimo tipas: Galai su sagtimis; Galai su „Chicago“ varžtais; Galai su dekoratyvinėmis sagomis („Concho“); Greitai keičiami galai; Galai su karabinais; Surišami galai; Kita
es: Tipo de sujeción de broca: Extremos con hebilla; Extremos con tornillo Chicago; Extremos con concho; Extremos de cambio rápido; Extremos con broche; Extremos para atar; Otro
bg-BG: Тип закрепване на битовете: С катарами; С винтове Чикаго; С кончоси; Със система за бърза смяна; С карабинери; С връзки; Други